Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.060

Leading organized crime.

(1) A person commits the offense of leading organized crime by:

(a) Intentionally organizing, managing, directing, supervising, or financing any three or more persons with the intent to engage in a pattern of criminal profiteering activity; or

(b) Intentionally inciting or inducing others to engage in violence or intimidation with the intent to further or promote the accomplishment of a pattern of criminal profiteering activity.

(2)(a) Leading organized crime as defined in subsection (1)(a) of this section is a class A felony.

(b) Leading organized crime as defined in subsection (1)(b) of this section is a class B felony.

[ 2003 c 53 s 88; 2001 c 222 s 9. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 7; 1984 c 270 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.